Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.413

Commencement—When required.

(1) Within the scope of its authority, an agency may commence an adjudicative proceeding at any time with respect to a matter within the agency's jurisdiction.

(2) When required by law or constitutional right, and upon the timely application of any person, an agency shall commence an adjudicative proceeding.

(3) An agency may provide forms for and, by rule, may provide procedures for filing an application for an adjudicative proceeding. An agency may require by rule that an application be in writing and that it be filed at a specific address, in a specified manner, and within specified time limits. The agency shall allow at least twenty days to apply for an adjudicative proceeding from the time notice is given of the opportunity to file such an application.

(4) If an agency is required to hold an adjudicative proceeding, an application for an agency to enter an order includes an application for the agency to conduct appropriate adjudicative proceedings, whether or not the applicant expressly requests those proceedings.

(5) An adjudicative proceeding commences when the agency or a presiding officer notifies a party that a prehearing conference, hearing, or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding will be conducted.

[ 1989 c 175 s 12; 1988 c 288 s 402.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.